Maryland, session 2025, HB0635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–109.
(a) At the commencement of a traffic stop or other stop, absent exigent
circumstances, a police officer shall:
(1) display proper identification to the stopped individual; and
(2) provide the following information to the stopped individual:
(i) the officer’s name;
(ii) the officer’s identification number issued by the law enforcement
agency the officer is representing;
(iii) the name of the law enforcement agency the police officer is
representing; and
(iv) the reason for the traffic stop or other stop.
(B) A POLICE OFFICER SHALL DOCUMENT ALL REASONS FOR A TRAFFIC
STOP OR OTHER STOP ON ANY CITATION OR POLICE REPORT RESULTING FROM THE
STOP.
[(b)] (C) A police officer’s failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section:
(1) may be grounds for administrative disciplinary action against the
officer; and
(2) may [not] serve as the basis for the exclusion of evidence under the
exclusionary rule.
[(c)] (D) A police officer may not prohibit or prevent a citizen from recording the
police officer’s actions if the citizen is otherwise acting lawfully and safely.
Article – Transportation
13–401.

HOUSE BILL 635 3
(a) This section applies to any vehicle required to be registered under this title.
(b) (1) If a vehicle is not registered, a person may not drive the vehicle on a
highway in this State.
(2) (i) If a person is convicted of a violation of this subsection that
involved the use of an off–highway recreational vehicle on a highway, the court shall notify
the Administration of the violation.
(ii) The Chief Judge of the District Court, in conjunction with the
Administration, shall establish uniform procedures for reporting convictions described in
this paragraph.
(c) If a vehicle is not registered, the owner of the vehicle may not knowingly allow
the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
(d) If the required registration fee for a vehicle has not been paid, a person may
not drive the vehicle on a highway in this State.
(e) If the required registration fee for a vehicle has not been paid, the owner of
the vehicle may not knowingly allow the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
(f) If the registration of a vehicle is canceled, a person may not drive the vehicle
on a highway in this State.
(g) If the registration of a vehicle is canceled, the owner of the vehicle may not
knowingly allow the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
(h) If the registration of a vehicle is suspended, a person may not drive the vehicle
on a highway in this State.
(i) If the registration of a vehicle is suspended, the owner of the vehicle may not
knowingly allow the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
(j) If the registration of a vehicle is revoked, a person may not drive the vehicle
on a highway in this State.
(k) If the registration of a vehicle is revoked, the owner of the vehicle may not
knowingly allow the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
(L) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION:

HOUSE BILL 635
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
13–411.
(a) On a vehicle for which two registration plates are required, one plate shall be
attached on the front and the other on the rear of the vehicle.
(b) On a vehicle for which one registration plate is required, the plate shall be
attached on the:
(1) Front of the vehicle for a Class F (tractor) vehicle; and
(2) Rear of the vehicle for every other vehicle.
(c) (1) At all times, each registration plate shall be:
(i) Maintained free from foreign materials, including registration
plate covers as defined in § 13–411.1 of this subtitle, and in a condition to be clearly legible;
and
(ii) Securely fastened to the vehicle for which it is issued:
1. In a horizontal position;
2. In a manner that prevents the plate from swinging; and
3. In a place and position to be clearly visible.
(2) For a violation involving the placement of an object framing or
bordering the edges of a registration plate, a police officer may enforce this subsection only
as a secondary action when the police officer detains a driver of a motor vehicle for a
suspected violation of another provision of the Code.
(d) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law, as to
any vehicle required to be registered under this title, a person may not drive the vehicle on
any highway in this State, unless there is attached to the vehicle and displayed on it, as
required in this title:
(1) A registration plate or plates issued for the vehicle by the
Administration for the current registration period; and

HOUSE BILL 635 5
(2) Any validation tab issued for the vehicle under this subtitle.
(e) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law, as to
any vehicle required to be registered under this title, the owner of the vehicle may not
permit the vehicle to be driven on any highway in this State, unless there is attached to
and displayed on the vehicle, as required in this title:
(1) A registration plate or plates issued by the Administration for the
current registration period; and
(2) Any validation tab issued for the vehicle under this subtitle.
(f) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law, a
vehicle used or driven in this State may not display on either its front or rear any expired
registration plate issued by any state.
(g) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law, a
person may not display or permit to be displayed on any vehicle used or driven in this State
any registration plate issued for another vehicle or to a person other than the owner of the
vehicle.
(h) (1) A vehicle registered as a historic or antique vehicle (Class L) in this
State or in another state, when used or driven in this State, may display vintage
registration plates as an indication of the historic or antique nature of the vehicle. Except
as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the place on the vehicle provided for the
display of registration plates may only be used for the display of current registration plates
in accordance with subsections (a) through (c) of this section, and any vintage registration
plates which are used shall be displayed elsewhere on the vehicle.
(2) If the Administration authorizes the display of vintage registration
plates in lieu of current registration plates, as provided in § 13–936.1 of this title, the
vintage registration plates shall be displayed as required under subsections (a) through (c)
of this section. However, the current registration plates shall be kept in the vehicle at all
times.
(i) It is the duty of every police officer to report to the Administration all vehicles
operated in violation of this section. The Administration shall verify whether the owner of
a reported vehicle has complied with this section.
(J) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.

HOUSE BILL 635
(2) A POLICE OFFICER MAY NOT STOP A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR
DISPLAYING AN EXPIRED REGISTRATION PRIOR TO THE FIRST DAY OF THE FOURTH
MONTH FOLLOWING THE ORIGINAL EXPIRATION DATE OF THE REGISTRATION.
(3) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
13–701.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, as to any vehicle required to be
registered under this title, a person may not drive the vehicle on any highway in this State,
unless the vehicle displays current registration plates and a current registration card is
carried as required in this title.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title, as to any vehicle required to be
registered under this title, an owner of the vehicle may not knowingly permit the vehicle to
be driven on a highway in this State, unless the vehicle displays current registration plates
and a current registration card is carried as required in this title.
(C) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER MAY NOT STOP A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR
DISPLAYING AN EXPIRED REGISTRATION PRIOR TO THE FIRST DAY OF THE FOURTH
MONTH FOLLOWING THE ORIGINAL EXPIRATION DATE OF THE REGISTRATION.
(3) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.

HOUSE BILL 635 7
13–703.
(g) (1) A person may not display on or for a vehicle any registration plate that
is neither:
[(1)] (I) Issued for the vehicle; or
[(2)] (II) Otherwise lawfully used on or for the vehicle under this title.
(2) (I) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY
AS A SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE
CODE.
(II) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE
DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
2. SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION
OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
21–604.
(a) A person may not turn a vehicle at an intersection, unless the vehicle is in the
position required by § 21–601 of this subtitle.
(b) A person may not turn a vehicle to enter a private road or driveway or
otherwise turn a vehicle from a direct course or move it right or left on a roadway or from
a shoulder or bikeway onto a roadway, unless the movement can be made with reasonable
safety.
(c) A person may not, if any other vehicle might be affected by the movement,
turn a vehicle until he gives an appropriate signal in the manner required by this subtitle.
(d) When required, a signal of intention to turn right or left shall be given
continuously during at least the last 100 feet traveled by the vehicle before turning; except
that a bicyclist may interrupt the turning signal to maintain control of the bicycle.
(e) If there is an opportunity to signal, a person may not stop or suddenly decrease
the speed of a vehicle until he gives an appropriate signal in the manner required by this
subtitle to the driver of any other vehicle immediately to the rear.
(f) The signals provided for in § 21–605(b) and (c) of this subtitle:

HOUSE BILL 635
(1) May be used to indicate an intention to turn, change lanes, or start from
a stopped, standing, or parked position; and
(2) May not be flashed as a courtesy or “do pass” signal to the driver of any
other vehicle approaching from the rear.
(G) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
21–605.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, each required stop
or turn signal shall be given:
(1) By hand and arm in conformity with § 21–606 of this subtitle; or
(2) By signal lamps.
(b) Each motor vehicle in use on a highway shall be equipped with and the
required signal given by signal lamps, if the distance from the center of the top of the
steering post to the left outside limit of the body, cab, or load of the vehicle is more than 24
inches.
(c) Each motor vehicle in use on a highway shall be equipped with and the
required signal given by signal lamps if, for any vehicle or combination of vehicles, the
distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the rear limit of the body or load
is more than 14 feet.
(D) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.

HOUSE BILL 635 9
(2) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
21–1111.
(a) A person may not drop, throw, or place on a highway any glass bottle, glass,
nails, tacks, wire, cans, or any other substance likely to injure any person, animal, or
vehicle on the highway.
(b) Any person who drops, throws, or places or permits to be dropped, thrown, or
placed on a highway any destructive, hazardous, or injurious material immediately shall
remove it or cause it to be removed.
(c) Any person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway also shall
remove from the highway any glass or other injurious substance dropped from the vehicle.
(d) A person may not throw, dump, discharge, or deposit any trash, junk, or other
refuse on any highway or public bridge or in any public waters.
(e) The owner of the vehicle, if present in the vehicle, or, in his absence, the driver
of the vehicle is presumed to be responsible for any violation of this section, if:
(1) The violation is caused by an occupant of the vehicle;
(2) The vehicle has two or more occupants; and
(3) It cannot be determined which occupant is the violator.
(f) A violation of this section is considered a moving violation for purposes of §
16–402 of this article.
(G) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION:

HOUSE BILL 635
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
21–1117.
(a) (1) This section applies throughout this State, whether on or off a highway.
(2) For purposes of this section, any noise level above that adopted by the
Administrator under § 22–601 of this article is excessive.
(d) (1) A person may not drive a motor vehicle in any improper manner
intended to cause excessive noise.
(2) (I) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY
AS A SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE
CODE.
(II) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE
DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
2. SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION
OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
21–1133.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person may not drive,
stand, or park a vehicle in a dedicated bus lane unless authorized by the local jurisdiction
in which the dedicated bus lane is located.
(b) The following vehicles may be driven, allowed to stand, or, as appropriate,
parked in a dedicated bus lane:
(1) A transit vehicle owned, operated, or contracted for by the Maryland
Transit Administration, the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, or a local
department of transportation;

HOUSE BILL 635 11
(2) A school bus;
(3) A bicycle;
(4) An emergency vehicle; and
(5) A vehicle making a right turn at the next immediate intersection.
(C) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
22–101.
(a) (2) (I) A person may not do any act forbidden or fail to do any act
required under this title.
(II) 1. A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS PARAGRAPH
ONLY AS A SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF
A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE
CODE.
2. A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH:
A. MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE
DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
B. SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION
OF SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR
OTHER PROCEEDING.
22–203.

HOUSE BILL 635
(b) (1) Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, shall be equipped with at
least two headlamps with at least one on each side of the front of the motor vehicle, which
headlamps shall emit white light and comply with the requirements and limitations set
forth in this title.
(2) (I) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY
AS A SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE
CODE.
(II) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE
DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
2. SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION
OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
22–204.
(f) (1) Either a tail lamp or a separate lamp shall be constructed and placed
to illuminate, with a white light, the rear registration plate and render it clearly legible
from a distance of 50 feet to the rear. Any tail lamp or tail lamps, together with any separate
lamp or lamps for illuminating the rear registration plate, shall be wired to be lighted
whenever the head lamps or auxiliary driving lamps are lighted.
(2) (I) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY
AS A SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE
CODE.
(II) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE
DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
2. SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION
OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
22–206.

HOUSE BILL 635 13
(a) Every motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer shall be equipped
with at least one stop lamp meeting the requirements of § 22–219(a) of this subtitle, and
the following vehicles shall meet the following additional requirements:
(1) (i) Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, registered in this
State and sold as a new vehicle after June 1, 1967, shall be equipped with at least two stop
lamps;
(ii) Every passenger vehicle manufactured on or after September 1,
1985, shall be equipped with a red center high mount stop lamp mounted with its center
on the vertical centerline of the vehicle as the vehicle is viewed from the rear; and
(iii) Every pickup truck, van, and sport utility vehicle manufactured
on or after September 1, 1993, shall be equipped with a red center high mount stop lamp
mounted with its center on the vertical centerline of the vehicle as the vehicle is viewed
from the rear; and
(2) After July 1, 1971, every trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer shall be
equipped with at least two stop lamps.
(b) Every motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer registered in this
State and sold as a new vehicle after June 1, 1961, shall be equipped with electric turn
signal lamps meeting the requirements of § 22–219(b) through (h) of this subtitle, except
that:
(1) Motorcycles manufactured before January 1, 1973, need not be
equipped with electric turn signal lamps; and
(2) The requirements of this section apply only to those trailers,
semitrailers, and pole trailers that are registered in this State and sold as new vehicles on
or after July 1, 1971.
(c) Any special mobile equipment that is being towed shall be equipped with at
least 2 stop lamps that meet the requirements of § 22–219(a) of this subtitle and electric
turn signals that meet the requirements of § 22–219(b) of this subtitle if the special mobile
equipment:
(1) Obstructs the tail lamps, stop lamps, turn signals, or except for the
registration plate lamp, any lamp of the towing vehicle required by law to be visible from
the rear; or
(2) Extends more than 12 feet from the rear of the towing vehicle.
(D) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) OF
THIS SECTION ONLY AS A SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS

HOUSE BILL 635
A DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER
PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
22–403.
(a) Every motor vehicle shall be equipped with at least one mirror located to
reflect to the driver a view of the highway for a distance of at least 200 feet to the rear of
the vehicle.
(b) Every motor vehicle registered in this State shall be equipped with an outside
mirror on the driver’s side located to reflect to the driver a view of the highway for a distance
of at least 200 feet to the rear of the vehicle and along the driver’s side of the vehicle. This
subsection does not apply to motorcycles, which are governed by subsection (c) of this
section.
(c) Every motorcycle shall be equipped with two rearview mirrors, one each
attached to the right and left handlebars, which shall meet applicable federal motor vehicle
safety standards.
(d) Where the view through the inside rearview mirror is obstructed, two outside
rearview mirrors are required.
(E) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.

HOUSE BILL 635 15
22–406.
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a person may
not operate a vehicle registered under § 13–912, § 13–913, § 13–917, or § 13–937 of this
article on a highway in this State if:
(i) In the case of a vehicle registered under § 13–912 of this article,
there is affixed to any window of the vehicle any tinting materials added to the window
after manufacture of the vehicle that do not allow a light transmittance through the window
of at least 35%; and
(ii) In the case of a vehicle registered under § 13–913, § 13–917, or §
13–937 of this article, there is affixed to any window to the immediate right or left of the
driver any window tinting materials added after manufacture of the vehicle that do not
allow a light transmittance through the window of at least 35%.
(2) (I) If a police officer observes that a vehicle is being operated in
violation of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the officer may [stop the driver of the vehicle
and, in addition to]:
1. ENFORCE PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY
AS A SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE
CODE; AND
2. A. ISSUE a citation charging the driver with the
offense[, issue]; OR
B. ISSUE to the driver a safety equipment repair order in
accordance with the provisions of § 23–105 of this article.
(II) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE
DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
2. SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION
OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR
OTHER PROCEEDING.
22–602.

HOUSE BILL 635
(a) A person may not drive on a highway in this State any motor vehicle or
combination of vehicles of a type required to be registered under Title 13 of this article, in
a manner that, at any time, at any speed, or under any condition of grade, load,
acceleration, or deceleration, exceeds the maximum sound level limits established under §
22–601 of this subtitle for the operation of that type of motor vehicle or combination of
vehicles.
(b) An owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may not permit to be driven on a highway
in this State any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles of a type required to be registered
under Title 13 of this article, in a manner that, at any time, at any speed, or under any
condition of grade, load, acceleration, or deceleration, exceeds the maximum sound level
limits established under § 22–601 of this subtitle for the operation of that type of motor
vehicle or combination of vehicles.
(C) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MAY BE GROUNDS FOR ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION AGAINST THE OFFICER; AND
(II) SHALL MAKE ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION INADMISSIBLE IN ANY TRIAL OR OTHER
PROCEEDING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.